Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201377-3206.02
Authority; transfer to land bank
authorized.

Notwithstanding
any provision of the Land Reutilization Act to the contrary, a land reutilization
authority may transfer property held by such authority to a land bank created
under the Nebraska Municipal Land Bank Act upon such terms and conditions
as may be agreed upon between the authority and the land bank.

Laws 2013, LB97, § 29.
October 1, 2013
Nebraska Municipal Land Bank Act, see section 19-5201.